Arkansas statutes. Title 21 Public Officers and Employees
Chapter 3

Recruiting, Hiring, and Appointment

Subchapter 1

— General Provisions

21-3-101. Equal employment hiring program.

Every state agency, board, commission, institution of higher education, and every constitutional officer as defined in Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 56, § 1, shall adopt and pursue a comprehensive equal employment hiring program designed to achieve a goal of increasing the percentage of minority employees within the agency, board, commission, institution of higher education, or constitutional office to a level that approximates the percentage of minorities in the state's population.

(1)Every state agency, board, commission, institution of higher education, and constitutional officer shall report to the Legislative Council on June 30 of each year regarding its efforts to achieve its equal employment hiring program goal.

However, the report required of any institution by §6-63-103 may be used in lieu of the report required under this subsection and shall be filed as provided in this subsection.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 426, § 1; 2001, No. 1226, § 1.

21-3-102. Selective Service registration — Definition.

As used in this section, “statement of selective service status” means a statement on an application for employment with the State of Arkansas or for admission to any public institution of higher education, sworn under penalty of perjury, that:

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1962, § 96.

Subchapter 2

— Age Discrimination

21-3-201. Definition.

For the purposes of this subchapter, “public employer” means any agency, department, board, commission, bureau, council, institution, or other entity of the state supported by appropriation of state or federal funds, or any county or municipality or other political subdivision of this state. “Public employer” specifically includes public universities, colleges, and public school districts.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 25, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3501.

21-3-202. Applicability.

The prohibitions in this subchapter shall be limited to individuals who are at least forty (40) years of age.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 25, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3505; Acts 1989 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 33, § 1.

21-3-203. Age discrimination prohibited — Exceptions.

It shall be unlawful for a public employer to:

Fail or refuse to hire or to discharge any individual or otherwise discriminate against any individual with respect to his or her compensation, terms, conditions, or privileges of employment because of the individual's age;

Limit, segregate, or classify employees in any way which would deprive or tend to deprive any individual of employment opportunities or otherwise adversely affect his or her status as an employee because of the individual's age; or

Reduce the wage rate of any employee in order to comply with this subchapter.

It shall not be unlawful for a public employer to:

Take any action otherwise prohibited by this subchapter where age is a bona fide occupational qualification, reasonably necessary to the normal operation of the particular business, or where the differentiation is based on reasonable factors other than age; or

Discharge or otherwise discipline an individual for good cause.

In this subchapter the Arkansas legislature intended to prohibit age discrimination in public employment against employees under 70 years of age and also to provide public employers the discretion to retain employees who have reached age 70. The statute simply does not afford employees who have reached 70 years of age the same protection that it does younger employees. Evans v. Pugh, 902 F.2d 689 (8th Cir. 1990) (decision prior to 1989 amendment).

This section affords no protection for those who have passed their seventieth birthday and they do not have a protectable property interest in continued employment. Evans v. University of Ark. Bd. of Trustees, 715 F. Supp. 249 (E.D. Ark. 1989), aff'd sub nom. Evans v. Pugh, 902 F.2d 689 (8th Cir. 1990) (decision prior to 1989 amendment).

Although an employee can continue to work beyond the attainment of age 70 if he receives written authorization from the chief administrative officer, the chief administrative officer is not required to give written authorization. Because written authorization is entirely within the discretion of the chief administrative officer, it cannot be said that an employee has a protectable property interest in his continued employment. Evans v. University of Ark. Bd. of Trustees, 715 F. Supp. 249 (E.D. Ark. 1989), aff'd sub nom. Evans v. Pugh, 902 F.2d 689 (8th Cir. 1990) (decision prior to 1989 amendment).

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning authorization to continue employment, was repealed by Acts 1989 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 33, § 4. The section was derived from Acts 1979, No. 25, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3504.

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning exceptions to compulsory retirement, expired pursuant to its own terms on December 31, 1993. This section was derived from Acts 1989 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 33, § 3.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 25, §§ 2, 3; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-3502, 12-3503; Acts 1989 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 33, § 1.

21-3-204. [Repealed.]

(1)Nothing in this subchapter shall be construed to prohibit compulsory retirement of any employee who has attained sixty-five (65) years of age, and who, for the two-year period immediately before retirement, is employed in a bona fide executive or a high policy-making position if the employee is entitled to an immediate nonforfeitable annual retirement benefit from a pension, savings, or deferred compensation plan, or any combination of such plans, of the employer of the employee, which equals, in the aggregate, at least forty-four thousand dollars ($44,000).

In applying the retirement benefit test of subdivision (a)(1) of this section, if any such retirement benefit is in a form other than a straight life annuity with no ancillary benefits, or if employees contribute to any such plan or make rollover contributions, that benefit shall be adjusted by the actuary of the employee's public retirement system, so that the benefit is the equivalent of a straight life annuity with no ancillary benefits under a plan to which employees do not contribute and under which no rollover contributions are made.

The prohibitions of this subchapter shall apply to employees with unlimited tenure who retire after July 1, 1982.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 25, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3505; Acts 1989 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 33, § 2.

21-3-206. [Expired.]

21-3-301. Uniform Classification and Compensation Act rules.

Any requirement or rule set up for the purpose of selecting employees paid in whole or in part with state funds for positions subject to the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, §21-5-201 et seq., shall include rules under this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1947, No. 414, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2318; Acts 2003, No. 653, § 1; 2019, No. 315, § 2317.

Amendments. The 2003 amendment substituted “Uniform Classification and Compensation Act” for “Civil service or merit system” in the section catchline; deleted “civil service or merit system” preceding “requirement,” inserted “for positions … §21-5-201 et seq.” and substituted “under this subchapter” for “in accordance with §§21-3-302 —21-3-305.”

The 2019 amendment substituted “rules” for “regulations” in the section heading and in the section; and substituted “requirement or rule” for “requirement, rule, or regulation”.

21-3-302. Veterans Preference Law — Definition.

This section shall be entitled the “Veterans Preference Law”.

For purposes of this section, “veteran” means:

A person honorably discharged from a tour of active duty, other than active duty for training only, with the United States Armed Forces; or

Any person who has served honorably in the National Guard or a reserve component of the United States Armed Forces for a period of at least six (6) years, whether the person has retired or been discharged or not.

A state agency or institution of higher education subject to the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, § 21-5-201 et seq., or a school district as defined under § 6-20-1903, shall provide a veterans preference in interviewing and hiring to an applicant if the applicant:

Indicates on the employment application that he or she is:

A veteran;

A disabled veteran; or

The surviving spouse of a deceased veteran who is unmarried at the time of application for employment and remains unmarried until the decision to hire is made;

Is a citizen and resident of this state; and

Meets substantially equal qualifications of other applicants.

If an examination, evaluation, or similar instrument is given to establish a list of qualified candidates to be interviewed for a position at a state agency or institution of higher education subject to the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, § 21-5-201 et seq., and an applicant entitled to a veterans preference under this section attains a passing grade, the applicant shall have five (5) points added to his or her final earned rating if the examination, evaluation, or similar instrument is subject to numerical scoring.

If a veteran is not selected for a position for which the successful candidate was selected based on a numerical score, at the veteran's request the selection authority shall provide the veteran with his or her base score, adjusted score, and the successful candidate's score.

If the examination, evaluation, or similar instrument is not subject to numerical scoring, the selection authority shall demonstrate how veterans preference was applied in developing a list of qualified candidates to be interviewed and in selecting the successful candidate for the position.

If the selection authority used a scoring method other than numerical scoring, at the veteran's request the selection authority shall provide all documentation to the veteran to demonstrate to the veteran how the veterans preference was used to:

Develop a list of qualified candidates to be interviewed; and

Select the successful candidate for the position.

A veteran who established by the records of the United States Department of Veterans Affairs the existence of a service-connected disability, or a veteran who is over fifty-five (55) years of age, disabled, and entitled to a pension or compensation under existing laws, or the spouse of a veteran with a service-connected disability whose disability disqualifies him or her for selection shall have ten (10) points instead of five (5) points added to his or her final earned rating on the examination, evaluation, or similar instrument.

If a veteran is not selected for a position for which the successful candidate was selected based on a numerical score, at the veteran's request the selection authority shall provide the veteran with his or her base score, adjusted score, and the successful candidate's score.

This subsection does not require the selection authority to provide the veteran with testing materials or any other information concerning the successful candidate or other applicants that is not authorized for release under this subsection or authorized for release to the public under the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, § 25-19-101 et seq.

The qualified veteran's status shall be considered on questions of promotion and retention of employees according to § 21-3-304.

The names of candidates who have qualified in an examination, evaluation, or similar instrument given for the purpose of establishing an interview or employment list shall be entered on an appropriate register or list of eligibles in the following order:

Names of ten-point-preference eligibles shall be placed at the head of the register or applicant list of persons certified as having equal eligibility points;

Names of five-point-preference eligibles shall be placed at the head of the register or applicant list of persons certified as having equal eligibility points; and

Names of all other eligibles who do not have preference as provided in this section shall be placed on the register or applicant list in accordance with their ranking of eligibility points.

The persons entitled to preference shall not be disqualified from holding any position on account of age or by reason of any physical disability, provided that the age or disability does not render the person incapable to perform properly the duties of the position for which he or she applied.

This section does not apply to an elected official or political appointee in:

A state agency or institution of higher education subject to the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, § 21-5-201 et seq.;

A school district as defined under § 6-20-1903; or

The administrative assistant or secretary of an elected official or political appointee.

Amendments. The 2003 amendment rewrote this section.

The 2013 amendment by No. 444 rewrote (c) and (h).

The 2013 amendment by No. 474 rewrote (d).

Ark. L. Rev.

Michael D. Sutton, Comment: Forging a New Breed: The Emergence of Veterans' Preference Statutes Within the Private Sector, 67 Ark. L. Rev. 1081 (2014).

Amendments. The 2003 amendment rewrote this section.

The 2013 amendment by No. 444, in (b), added “provided under this section,” substituted “state” for “department” preceding “agency,” inserted “subject to the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, §21-5-201 et seq., or a school district as defined under §6-20-1903”.

The 2013 amendment by No. 474 rewrote (a); and, in (b), added “provided under this section” and substituted “state agency or institution of higher education subject to the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, §21-5-201 et seq.” for “department, agency, or institution of higher education”.

Amendments. The 2003 amendment rewrote this section.

Amendments. The 2003 amendment rewrote this section.

Amendments. The 2003 amendment rewrote (b).

U.S. Code. The Uniformed Services Employment and Reemployment Rights Act of 1994, referred to in (b), is codified as 38 U.S.C. §§ 101 nt and 4301 et seq.

Cross References. Military leaves for state employees, §21-4-212.

Publisher's Notes. This subchapter, concerning the Merit System Board, was repealed by Acts 1989, No. 536, § 6. The subchapter was derived from the following sources:

§21-3-401. Acts 1981, No. 693, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3907.

§21-3-402. Acts 1981, No. 693, §§ 1-4; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-3901 — 12-3904.

§21-3-403. Acts 1981, No. 693, §§ 3, 5, 6; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-3903, 12-3905, 12-3906.

§21-3-404. Acts 1981, No. 693, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3905.

Effective Dates. Acts 1975, No. 551, § 11: Mar. 25, 1975. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that a program should be established to provide students attending institutions of higher learning in this State an opportunity to become better informed and more knowledgeable in Arkansas government by working in the various State agencies, departments, and institutions; that the employment of such students would not only be most beneficial to the student and the agency employing the student but would also encourage graduates of such institutions to remain in the State of Arkansas; that this Act is designed to accomplish this worthy purpose and should be given effect immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

History.

Acts 1981, No. 527, §§ 1-4; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-2322.1 — 12-2322.4; Acts 1995, No. 40, § 1; 2003, No. 653, § 1; 2013, No. 444, §§ 1, 2; 2013, No. 474, § 1.

21-3-303. Failure to hire veteran.

If requested by the veteran applicant and in addition to the requirements under §21-3-302(d), a hiring official or selection authority for a state agency or institution of higher education subject to the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, §21-5-201 et seq., shall submit in writing to the veteran the reason the veteran was not:

Included on a list of qualified candidates to be interviewed; and

Selected for the position.

The written reason provided under this section shall become a part of the employment application records of the state agency or institution of higher education subject to the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, §21-5-201 et seq., or a school district as defined under §6-20-1903, and be retained for the same period of time as all other employment applications as established by law or agency policy.

History.

Acts 1947, No. 414, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2320; Acts 2003, No. 653, § 1; 2013, No. 444, § 3; 2013, No. 474, § 2.

21-3-304. Reduction in force.

A department or agency director or institution of higher education president or chancellor may separate any employee without prejudice because of lack of funds, curtailment of work, or in order to permit reinstatement of employees upon their release from periods of military service from the United States Armed Forces.

However, no employee as defined by §21-5-203 shall be separated while there are emergency, intermittent, temporary, provisional, or probationary employees serving in the same class of position in the same department or agency.

(1)The order of separation due to reduction in force shall be based upon criteria established by the Statewide Workforce Reduction Policy as issued and administered by the Office of Personnel Management.

For the purpose of establishing this layoff formula, the veteran's service in the United States Armed Forces shall be considered as service with the department or agency and computed as a part of his or her seniority.

History.

Acts 1947, No. 414, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2322; Acts 2003, No. 653, § 1.

21-3-305. Reemployment.

An employee as defined in §21-5-203 who has established veterans preference eligibility and has resigned while in good standing or who has been separated without prejudice shall be eligible for reemployment within a period of time no less than the continuous period of his or her service in a department, agency, or institution of higher education, provided that he or she has been certified by the department or agency director or institution of higher education president or chancellor as meeting the current minimum qualifications as to training and experience of the class of position to which he or she is being reemployed.

Prior to making the minimum qualifications certification, the department or agency director or institution of higher education president or chancellor may require the employee to pass a qualifying examination.

For the purpose of reemployment eligibility under the provisions of this section, time spent in the United States Armed Forces shall not be counted.

History.

Acts 1947, No. 414, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2321; Acts 2003, No. 653, § 1.

21-3-306. Rights of reservists — Legislative intent.

It is declared to be the intent of the General Assembly that any person who holds an other than temporary position in the employ of the State of Arkansas shall not be denied retention in employment or any promotion or other incident or advantage of employment or transferred involuntarily to another position because the person is a member of a reserve component of the United States Armed Forces.

The provisions of the reemployment rights protections of §12-62-413 and the Uniformed Services Employment and Re-employment Rights Act of 1994 as in effect on January 1, 2003, shall be applicable, and the refusal of any state official to comply therewith shall subject him or her to removal from office.

This section shall be retroactive and shall take effect as of the date of the entry of any state employee into one (1) of the reserve components of the United States Armed Forces.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 406, §§ 1-3; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-2352 — 12-2354; Acts 2003, No. 653, § 1.

Subchapter 4

— Merit System Board

21-3-401 — 21-3-404. [Repealed.]

21-3-501. Policy — Purpose.

Recognizing the tremendous potential represented by the young people attending Arkansas institutions of higher education, and in due consideration of the great interest of the people of the State of Arkansas in retaining graduates of Arkansas institutions of higher education within the state, with the further conviction that it is in the best interest of all citizens of the state to recruit and retain qualified college graduates within the State of Arkansas government system, and recognizing the great contribution to the educational process that learning experiences within state government can provide, the General Assembly finds and declares that an affirmative effort to provide college students with employment opportunities within state government is important to the welfare and security of this state and nation and, consequently, is an important public service.

The General Assembly further finds and declares that cooperative education is having, and will continue to have, a major impact on this state in meeting the socially and economically desirable goals of educating and retaining young people within this state.

It is, therefore, the policy of the General Assembly and the purpose of this subchapter to establish a cooperative education program within the State of Arkansas government system to attract and retain qualified personnel from Arkansas institutions of higher education while at the same time contributing to the educational process through learning opportunities within state government.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 551, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2355.

21-3-502. Definitions.

For the purposes of this subchapter:

“Academic credit” means the recognized unit requirements which students attending eligible institutions must accomplish in order to receive a degree for completion of a two-year or four-year course of study;

“Arkansas Cooperative Education Advisory Committee” means the committee established by this subchapter to:

Determine the eligibility of educational institutions;

Review the operation of the cooperative education program through periodic meetings;

Make recommendations to the participating institutions, the state personnel administrator, and to the General Assembly; and

Perform all other appropriate functions to provide for the advancement of the cooperative education program;

“Cooperative education” means the process of education which formally integrates the student's academic study with work experience in cooperating employer organizations.

The normal plan is for the student to alternate periods of college study with educational-work experience on assignments which relate to the student's stated career objectives;

“Eligible institutions of higher education” means any public or private two-year or four-year institution of higher education within the State of Arkansas which:

Is accredited by the North Central Association of Colleges and Schools, a candidate for such accreditation, or gives satisfactory assurance that it has the potential for accreditation and is making progress which, if continued, will result in its achieving accreditation;

Does not discriminate in the admission of students on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, or national origin and is in compliance with the Civil Rights Acts of 1964 and 1968 and executive orders issued pursuant thereto; and

Is certified to the state personnel administrator by the Arkansas Cooperative Education Advisory Committee as an eligible institution based on the criteria established in § 21-3-508; and

“State personnel administrator” means the head of the Office of Personnel Management, his or her successor, or the person designated by the state personnel administrator to perform the duties assigned to the administrator or to the office.

U.S. Code. The Civil Rights Act of 1964, referred to in this section, is primarily codified as 42 U.S.C. § 2000c et seq. The Civil Rights Act of 1968, referred to in this section, is codified as 18 U.S.C. §§ 231-233, 241, 242, 1153, 2101, 2102, 25 U.S.C. § 1301 et seq., 28 U.S.C. § 1360 nt and 42 U.S.C. §§ 1973j, 3533, 3535, 3601 — 3619, and 3631.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 551, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2356.

21-3-503. Student employment not restricted.

Nothing in this subchapter is to be construed as barring or in any way limiting the employment of students within the State of Arkansas governmental system, even though the student is participating in the cooperative education program at an institution of higher education during employment with the State of Arkansas.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 551, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2363.

21-3-504. Creation and administration.

There is established a cooperative education program for hiring qualified students from eligible institutions of higher education within the State of Arkansas to be administered by the state personnel administrator and the Arkansas Cooperative Education Advisory Committee, as provided in this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 551, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2357.

21-3-505. Arkansas Cooperative Education Advisory Committee.

The Governor shall appoint an Arkansas Cooperative Education Advisory Committee to advise and consult with the state personnel administrator in carrying out the administration of this subchapter.

The state personnel administrator shall serve as chair ex officio of the committee, which shall consist of the following:

Four (4) representatives of the state government system, who shall be appointed for terms of four (4) years, except when a member is appointed to complete an unexpired term; and

Five (5) representatives of institutions of higher education appointed from educational institutions with cooperative education or internship programs with the five (5) members selected from the five (5) institutions with the greatest number participating in this program.

Until such time as experience reveals the number of students in the program, three (3) of the five (5) members shall be appointed from public institutions and two (2) from private institutions.

The committee shall meet as frequently as the state personnel administrator deems necessary but not less than semiannually.

Upon request by five (5) or more members of the committee, the state personnel administrator shall immediately call a meeting of the committee.

The committee shall meet to consider and approve by a favorable vote of five (5) or more members present at such meeting the eligibility of educational institutions having students desirous of applying for the cooperative education program with the state personnel administrator.

Approval shall be considered necessary no more than one (1) time every three (3) years and shall be based upon the criteria established in § 21-3-508.

The committee shall further consider, evaluate, and promote cooperative education within the entire system of state government and on the campuses of all eligible institutions of higher education as the committee sees fit.

Publisher's Notes. The terms of the four representatives of the state government system are arranged so that one term expires every year.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 551, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2362.

21-3-506. Agency eligibility.

All offices, branches, and agencies within state government shall be eligible to participate in the cooperative education program.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 551, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2361.

21-3-507. Student eligibility.

A student shall be eligible for a cooperative education placement upon:

Certification to the state personnel administrator by the student's cooperative education program director or coordinator that the student:

Has completed twenty-four (24) or more college credit hours or their equivalent measure; and

Is presently enrolled as a full-time student or has completed or will complete the equivalent of twelve (12) college or graduate credit hours in the six-month period prior to taking employment under the cooperative education program; and

Completion of all other application procedures required by the Office of Personnel Management for the administration of the cooperative education program.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 551, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2359.

21-3-508. School eligibility.

In order for any institution of higher education within the State of Arkansas to participate in the cooperative education program, that institution must meet the following criteria, as determined by the Arkansas Cooperative Education Advisory Committee:

The institution has appointed a director or coordinator whose primary responsibility is the direction of that institution's cooperative education program, for which the director or coordinator receives proportionate compensation or released time from instruction or other administrative duties;

The institution will grant academic credit toward the student's degree program for the work period within the Arkansas state government system; and

The institution agrees to and does so provide the committee with a written summary of the evaluation made by the institution of the student's educational-work experience within sixty (60) days of the conclusion of that placement period.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 551, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2358.

21-3-509. State personnel administrator.

The state personnel administrator shall have the responsibility to administer the cooperative education program.

The duties of the administrator include, but are not limited to:

Disseminating information on the availability of students through the cooperative education program and collecting requests for employment of cooperative education students;

Conveying state job opportunity information to eligible institutions, to include job titles, description of duties in general, and salary and wage information;

Promulgating and collecting application forms;

Conveying final employment and assignment decisions, in total, to all eligible institutions;

Keeping all necessary records both for the Office of Personnel Management and, as directed, by the Arkansas Cooperative Education Advisory Committee; and

All other activities necessary to the orderly and lawful administration of this subchapter and not otherwise specifically delegated by this subchapter.

Effective Dates. Acts 1971, No. 646, § 6: Apr. 7, 1971. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined that it may be necessary to extend the regular session of the Sixty-Eighth General Assembly as authorized in the Constitution; that under the provisions of Amendment 7 to the Constitution, enactments of the General Assembly that do not have an emergency clause do not become effective until ninety (90) days after the date of final adjournment of the General Assembly; that the extended session of the General Assembly may not adjourn in time for this Act to take effect prior to July 1, 1971, thereby depriving the agency for which funds are appropriated herein of necessary operating funds to commence the next fiscal biennium; and in order that the appropriation made herein may be available on July 1, 1971, the General Assembly hereby determines that the immediate passage of the Act is necessary for the maintenance and operation of the essential governmental services. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval, provided that the appropriation authorized herein shall not be available until July 1, 1971.”

Students preparing for careers in government shall be given priority in employment under this program.

Only qualified graduate level students who are citizens of the State of Arkansas shall be eligible to receive the benefits of the provisions of this section.

In addition, internship agreements shall be based on the anticipated benefits and services to be rendered to the Legislative Council or the Department of Finance and Administration under the agreement with the institution of higher education.

All internship agreements entered into under the provisions of this section shall be at such rates as agreed to between the contracting institution of higher education and the Legislative Council or the Department of Finance and Administration, but shall not exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250) per month per student for the time required for the student to complete his or her degree requirements, including the internship work obligations under agreements entered into under the provisions of this section.

No such internship agreement shall be for more than twenty-one (21) months per student.

Publisher's Notes. This subchapter, concerning apprenticeship programs, was repealed by Acts 1989, No. 684, § 11. The subchapter was derived from the following sources:

21-3-701. Acts 1987, No. 722, § 1.

21-3-702. Acts 1987, No. 722, § 3.

21-3-703. Acts 1987, No. 722, § 2.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 551, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2360.

Subchapter 6

— Internship Program

21-3-601. Internship program.

The Legislative Council and the Department of Finance and Administration are authorized to establish, for their respective agencies, agreements with institutions of higher education to utilize highly qualified graduate level students who are seeking a Master of Arts or Master of Public Administration degree in the departments of political science of such institutions to perform duties for their respective agencies.

The program shall be known as an “internship program” through which graduate level students can obtain practical experience in state government.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 646, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2351.

Subchapter 7

— Apprenticeship Programs

21-3-701 — 21-3-703. [Repealed.]

21-3-801. Title.

This subchapter shall be known as the “Exceptional Employee Recruitment Program”.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 1039, § 1.